Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.455

Capitol purchase and development account.

The capitol purchase and development account is hereby created in the state treasury.

[ 1987 c 350 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 350: See note following RCW 79.105.150.